src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/Pron-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
    sina+Pron+Sg+Gen+Emph: sinu
    sina+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Emph: sinugi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Gen: su
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Emph: sinusse
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Emph: sinussegi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: sussegi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ill: susse
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ine+Emph: sinus
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Emph: sinuski
    sina+Pron+Sg+Ine: sus
    sina+Pron+Sg+Nom+Emph: sina
    sina+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: sinagi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Nom: sa
    sina+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: sindki
    sina+Pron+Sg+Par: sind
    sina+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: sinukski
    sina+Pron+Sg+Tra: sinuks
    sina+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: sinunigi
    sina+Pron+Sg+Trm: sinuni
    teie+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: teietagi
    teie+Pron+Pl+Abe: teieta
    teie+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: teiltki
    teie+Pron+Pl+Abl: teilt
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: teilgi
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ade: teil
    teie+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: teilegi
    teie+Pron+Pl+All: teile
    teie+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: teiegagi
    teie+Pron+Pl+Com: teiega
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: teistki
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ela: teist
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: teienagi
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ess: teiena
    teie+Pron+Pl+Gen+Emph: teie
    teie+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Emph: teiegi
    teie+Pron+Pl+Gen: te
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: teissegi
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ill: teisse
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: teiski
    teie+Pron+Pl+Ine: teis
    teie+Pron+Pl+Nom+Emph: teie
    teie+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: teiegi
    teie+Pron+Pl+Nom: te
    teie+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: teidki
    teie+Pron+Pl+Par: teid
    teie+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: teiekski
    teie+Pron+Pl+Tra: teieks
    teie+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: teienigi
    teie+Pron+Pl+Trm: teieni
    tema+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: temagagi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Com: temaga
    tema+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: tematagi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Abe: temata
    tema+Pron+Sg+Abl+Emph: temalt
    tema+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Emph: temaltki
    tema+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: taltki
    tema+Pron+Sg+Abl: talt
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ade+Emph: temal
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Emph: temalgi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: talgi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ade: tal
    tema+Pron+Sg+All+Emph: temale
    tema+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Emph: temalegi
    tema+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: tallegi
    tema+Pron+Sg+All: talle
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ela+Emph: temast
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Emph: temastki
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: tastki
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ela: tast
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: temanagi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ess: temana
    tema+Pron+Sg+Gen+Emph: tema
    tema+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Emph: temagi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Gen: ta
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ill+Emph: temasse
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Emph: temassegi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: tassegi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ill: tasse
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ine+Emph: temas
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Emph: temaski
    tema+Pron+Sg+Ine: tas
    tema+Pron+Sg+Nom+Emph: tema
    tema+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: temagi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Nom: ta
    tema+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: tedagi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Par: teda
    tema+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: temakski
    tema+Pron+Sg+Tra: temaks
    tema+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: temanigi
    tema+Pron+Sg+Trm: temani
    too+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: tolletagi
    too+Pron+Sg+Abe: tolleta
    too+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: tolleltki
    too+Pron+Sg+Abl: tollelt
    too+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: tollelgi
    too+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tolgi
    too+Pron+Sg+Ade: tollel
    too+Pron+Sg+Ade+Usage/Rare: tol
    too+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: tollelegi
    too+Pron+Sg+All: tollele
    too+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: tollegagi
    too+Pron+Sg+Com: tollega
    too+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: tollestki
    too+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tostki
    too+Pron+Sg+Ela: tollest
    too+Pron+Sg+Ela+Usage/Rare: tost
    too+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: tollenagi
    too+Pron+Sg+Ess: tollena
    too+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: tollegi
    too+Pron+Sg+Gen: tolle
    too+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: tollessegi
    too+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: tossegi
    too+Pron+Sg+Ill: tollesse
    too+Pron+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: tosse
    too+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: tolleski
    too+Pron+Sg+Ine: tolles
    too+Pron+Sg+Ine+Usage/Rare: tos
    too+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: toogi
    too+Pron+Sg+Nom: too
    too+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: todagi
    too+Pron+Sg+Par: toda
    too+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: tollekski
    too+Pron+Sg+Tra: tolleks
    too+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: tollenigi
    too+Pron+Sg+Trm: tolleni
